Connecticut, session 2026, HB05134.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 229 of the general statutes be amended to establish a
refundable child tax credit against the personal income tax for up to
three children, in the amount of six hundred dollars per child, for
taxpayers with federal adjusted gross income of less than one hundred
thousand dollars for single filers and two hundred thousand dollars or
less for married individuals filing jointly.